csv2fst/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_ii.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: madaabiiyaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: madaabiiyan 
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: madaabiiyaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: madaabiiyang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: madaabiiyeg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: madaabiid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: madaabiiwaad
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: madaabiing
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: madaabiisiwaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: madaabiisiwan 
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: madaabiisiwaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: madaabiisiwang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: madaabiisiweg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: madaabiisig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: madaabiisigwaa
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: madaabiising
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: madaabiiyaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: madaabiiyamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: madaabiiyaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: madaabiiyangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: madaabiiyegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiiwaapan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: madaabiingiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: madaabiisiwaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: madaabiisiwamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: madaabiisiwaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: madaabiisiwangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: madaabiisiwegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiisigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiisigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: madaabiisingiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: madaabiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: madaabiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: madaabiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: madaabiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: madaabiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: madaabiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: madaabiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: madaabiiwiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: madaabiisiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: madaabiisiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: madaabiisiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: madaabiisiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: madaabiisiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: madaabiisiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: madaabiisiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: madaabiisiiwiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: madaabiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: madaabiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: madaabiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: madaabiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: madaabiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: madaabiiwiingibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: madaabiisiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: madaabiisiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: madaabiisiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: madaabiisiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: madaabiisiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: madaabiisiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: madaabiisiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: madaabiisiiwiingibanen
